Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.48.010

Definitions.

(1) For the purpose of this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(a) "Building" has the definition in RCW 9A.04.110(5), and where a building consists of two or more units separately secured or occupied, each unit shall not be treated as a separate building;

(b) "Damages", in addition to its ordinary meaning, includes any charring, scorching, burning, or breaking, or agricultural or industrial sabotage, and shall include any diminution in the value of any property as a consequence of an act;

(c) "Property of another" means property in which the actor possesses anything less than exclusive ownership.

(2) To constitute arson it is not necessary that a person other than the actor has ownership in the building or structure damaged or set on fire.

[ 2002 c 32 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.48.010.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 32: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 12, 2002]." [ 2002 c 32 s 2.]

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38: See notes following RCW 9A.08.020.